North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 39. Leaf Tobacco Warehouses.

§ 106-452.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2006-162, s. 29, effective July 24, 2006.

§ 106-453.
Oath of tobacco weigher; duty of weigher to furnish list of number and weight of baskets weighed.

All leaf tobacco sold upon the floor of any tobacco warehouse shall first be weighed by some reliable person 18 years of age or older, who shall have first sworn and subscribed to the following oath, to wit: “I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will correctly and accurately weigh all tobacco offered for sale at the warehouse of
_______________ , and correctly test and keep accurate the scales upon which the tobacco so offered for sale is weighed.” Such oath shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county in which said warehouse is situated.

Immediately upon the weighing of any lot or lots of tobacco, the tobacco weigher shall furnish, upon request, to the person delivering such tobacco to the scale for weighing a true list showing the number of baskets of tobacco weighed and the individual weight of each such basket so presented.

History.

1895, c. 81, s. 2; Rev., s. 3043; C.S., s. 5125; 1951, c. 1105, s. 1; 1971, c. 1085, s. 2.

§ 106-454.
Warehouse proprietor, etc., to render bill of charges; penalty.

The owner, operator, or person in charge of each warehouse shall render to each seller of tobacco at the warehouse a bill plainly stating the amount charged for weighing and handling, the amount charged for auction fees, and the commission charged on such sale, and it shall be unlawful for any other charge or fees to be made or accepted. Any person, firm, corporation, or any employee thereof, violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor for the first offense, and for the second or additional offenses a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

1895, c. 81, ss. 3, 4; Rev., s. 3044; C.S., s. 5126; 1973, c. 1305; 1993, c. 539, s. 787; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 106-455.
Tobacco purchases to be paid for by cash or check to order.

The proprietor of each and every warehouse shall pay for all tobacco sold in said warehouse either in cash or by giving to the seller a check payable to his order in his full name or in his surname and initials and it shall be unlawful to use any other method. Every person, firm or corporation violating the provisions hereof shall, in addition to any and all civil liability which may arise by law, be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1931, c. 101, s. 1; 1939, c. 348; 1993, c. 539, s. 788; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

Legal Periodicals.

For discussion of this section prior to the 1939 amendment, see 9 N.C.L. Rev. 387 (1931).